sl-SI: Vrsta tkanja platna: Panamska vezava; Bombažno platno; Vezava ribja kost; Navadna vezava; Keprova vezava; Drugo
it: Tipo di tessitura della tela: Intreccio a canestro; Cotone duck; A spina di pesce; Intreccio semplice; Intreccio in twill; Altro
tr: Tuval dokuma tipi: Sepet örgü; Pamuklu kanvas; Balıksırtı; Düz örgü; Dimi örgü; Diğer
es: Tipo de tejido del lienzo: Tejido de cesta; Lona de algodón; Espiga; Tejido liso; Tejido de sarga; Otro
fi: Kankaan kudontatyyppi: Panamasidos; Duck-puuvilla; Kalanruoto; Palttinasidos; Toimikassidos; Muu
da: Lærredsvævningstype: Kurveflet; Bomuldsduck; Sildeben; Lærredsvævning; Kipervævning; Andet
vi: Kiểu dệt vải canvas: Dệt kiểu rổ; Vải canvas duck; Dệt xương cá; Dệt trơn; Dệt chéo; Khác
fr: Type de tissage de la toile: Armure nattée; Coton canevas; Chevrons; Armure unie; Armure sergée; Autre
pt-PT: Tipo de trama da tela: Ponto de cesto; Lona de algodão; Espinha de peixe; Tecido liso; Tecido de sarja; Outro
ko: 캔버스 직조 유형: 바스켓 위브; 코튼 덕; 헤링본; 평직; 능직; 기타
ru: Тип плетения холста: Рогожка; Хлопковое полотно (двунитка); Елочка; Полотняное переплетение; Саржевое переплетение; Другое
sk-SK: Typ tkania plátna: Panamová väzba; Bavlnené plátno; Rybia kosť; Plátnová väzba; Keprová väzba; Iné
el: Τύπος ύφανσης καμβά: Πλέξη καλαθιού; Βαμβακερό duck; Ψαροκόκκαλο; Απλή ύφανση; Ύφανση τουίλ (twill); Άλλο
cs: Typ vazby plátna: Panamová vazba; Kanvas (cotton duck); Rybí kost; Plátnová vazba; Keprová vazba; Ostatní
ja: キャンバス織りタイプ: バスケット織り; コットンダック; ヘリンボーン; 平織り; 綾織り; その他
nl: Canvas weeftype: Panamakatoen-binding; Katoenen duck; Visgraat; Platbinding; Keperbinding; Overig
pl: Rodzaj splotu płótna: Splot koszykowy; Płótno bawełniane (cotton duck); Jodełka; Splot płócienny; Splot skośny; Inne
zh-CN: 画布织纹类型: 席纹编织; 棉帆布; 人字纹编织; 平纹编织; 斜纹编织; 其他
de: Webart der Leinwand: Panamabindung; Segeltuch (Cotton Duck); Fischgrät; Leinwandbindung; Köperbindung; Sonstige
lt-LT: Drobės audimo tipas: Pintinis pynimas; Brezentas (Cotton duck); Eglutės raštas; Drobėtasis pynimas; Ruopelinis pynimas; Kita
en: Canvas weave type: Basket weave; Cotton duck; Herringbone; Plain weave; Twill weave; Other
nb: Vevetype for lerret: Kurvvev; Bomullsduck; Fiskebein; Lerretsbinding; Kypertbinding; Annet
ro-RO: Tip de țesătură de pânză: Țesătură tip coș; Pânză de bumbac (duck); Țesătură în os de pește; Țesătură simplă; Țesătură twill; Altele
sv: Målardukens vävtyp: Korgväv; Bomullskanvas; Fiskbensväv; Tuskaft; Kypertbindning; Övrigt
pt-BR: Tipo de trama da tela: Panamá (Basket weave); Lona de algodão; Espinha de peixe; Tafetá (Plain weave); Sarja (Twill weave); Outro
bg-BG: Тип тъкане на платното: Панама сплитка (Basket weave); Памучен плат (Duck); Рибена кост; Гладка сплитка (Plain weave); Кепър (Twill); Други
zh-TW: 畫布編織類型: 席紋編織; 粗帆布; 人字紋; 平紋編織; 斜紋編織; 其他
th: ประเภทการทอผ้าใบ: ลายขัดสานตะกร้า; ผ้าฝ้ายดั๊ก; ลายก้างปลา; ลายขัด; ลายทวิล; อื่นๆ
hr-HR: Vrsta tkanja platna: Panama preplet; Pamučno platno; Uzorak riblje kosti; Platneni preplet; Keper preplet; Ostalo
hu: Vászon szövet típusa: Kosárkötés; Pamutvászon (Cotton duck); Halszálkás; Vászonkötés; Sávolykötés; Egyéb